Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-124
Police; power to establish.

A city of the second class shall have the power to establish a night watch and police and to define the duties and powers of such night watch and police.

Laws 1879, § 39, V, p. 201;

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5018;

C.S.1922, § 4187;

C.S.1929, § 17-126;

R.S.1943, § 17-124;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 20.